Hawaii statutes.
§440-8.5 Powers and duties of the
commission. In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law,
the commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to provide for the
following:

(1) An appropriate method of ensuring that all
financial obligations are met by a promoter who conducts, holds, or gives a
boxing contest;

(2) A public record accounting for the distribution
of all tickets provided to the commission by a promoter and anything else of
value which is provided to the commission;

(3) Clinics or seminars on health and safety for
licensees, as deemed necessary by the commission;

(4) A mandatory neurological examination for any
boxer who is knocked out in a boxing contest, and an eye examination as part of
a boxer's annual medical examination;

(5) An automatic medical suspension from boxing for a
period of time to be determined by the commission for any boxer who is knocked
out from head blows or who has received a severe beating about the head. The
period of time of the automatic medical suspension shall be based upon the
severity of the beating received by the boxer;

(6) Procedures to evaluate the professional records
and physician's certification of each boxer participating in a professional
boxing contest in the State and to deny authorization to a boxer to fight when
the requirements of this paragraph are not met;

(7) Procedures to ensure that no boxer is permitted
to box while under suspension from any boxing commission due to:

(A) A recent knockout or series of
consecutive losses;

(B) An injury, any required medical
procedure, or a physician's denial of certification to box;

(C) Failure of any drug test; or

(D) The use of false aliases or falsifying or
attempting to falsify official identification cards or documents relating to
boxing;

(8) Procedures to review a suspension if appealed by
a boxer, including an opportunity for a boxer to present contradictory
evidence;

(9) Procedures to revoke a suspension if a boxer
furnishes proof of sufficiently improved medical or physical condition or
furnishes proof that the suspension was not, or is no longer, warranted by the
facts; and

(10) Establishing a boxing registry and the issuance
of an identification card to boxers. [L 1986, c 135, §5; am L 1987, c 126, §1;
am L 1992, c 202, §48; am L 2004, c 135, §7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next